Georgia, session 2025_26, SB156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Insurance Premium Reduction
Act."
S. B. 156
- 1 -

LC 46 1074
SECTION 2.
Code Section 33-9-4 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to standards
applicable to making and use of rates, is amended by revising paragraph (9) as follows:
"(9) No insurer shall base any standard or rating plan on vehicle insurance, in whole or
in part, directly or indirectly, upon race, creed, or ethnic extraction, or census tract; and"
SECTION 3.
Article 1 of Chapter 24 of Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general insurance provisions, is amended in Code Section 33-24-45, relating to cancellation
or nonrenewal of automobile or motorcycle policies and procedure for review by
Commissioner, by revising subparagraph (e)(5)(B) as follows:
"(B) In addition to other requirements, a notice of nonrenewal shall contain the
provisions of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, in substantially the form which
follows:
'NOTICE
Code Section 33-24-45 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated provides that this
insurer must, upon request, furnish you with the reasons for the failure to renew this
policy. If you wish to assert that the nonrenewal is unlawful, you must shall file a
written notice with this insurer before the time at which the nonrenewal becomes
effective. The notice must specify the manner in which the failure to renew is alleged
to be unlawful.
If you do not file the written notice, you may not later assert a claim or action against
this insurer based upon an unlawful nonrenewal."
SECTION 4.
Said article is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
S. B. 156
- 2 -

LC 46 1074
"33-24-59.34.
(a) All insurers in this state shall disclose on such insurer's public website all requests
made to the department to increase premium rates by more than 5 percent. All such
disclosures shall be accompanied by a justification report. The term 'justification report'
means a document which describes such insurer's reasoning and the data relied upon which
form the basis for such insurer's request.
(b) The department shall establish a state-run online database where consumers can
compare coverage options and insurance rates of all lines of insurance policies filed with
the department. At the discretion of the department, such database may not contain
information already publicly available on the All-Payer Claims Database.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, all insurers requesting
department approval of premium rate increases of more than 5 percent shall submit detailed
actuarial data to support such request.
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Commissioner shall hold
public hearings in accordance with Code Section 33-2-17 and other relevant law on all
premium rate increase requests of more than 10 percent.
(e) No insurer shall collude with another insurer with regard to premium rates. Any
insurer found by the Commissioner to have violated this subsection and whose actions are
determined by the Commissioner to have contributed toward premium inflation shall also
be found to have committed an unfair trade practice or act in violation of Code
Section 33-6-4.
(f) No insurer shall settle litigation with the primary purpose of manufacturing losses to
justify premium increases. Any insurer determined by the Commissioner to have violated
this subsection shall also be found to have committed an unfair trade practice or act in
violation of Code Section 33-6-4.
(g) No insurance policy may be sold to a consumer in this state without such consumer
being represented by an independent insurance broker."
S. B. 156
- 3 -

LC 46 1074
SECTION 5.
Said article is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"33-24-47.2.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no insurance policy in this state shall
be nonrenewed unless the insured is provided at least 60 days' written notice of such
nonrenewal. Such notice of nonrenewal shall be delivered either in person or by depositing
the notice in the United States mail to be dispatched by at least first-class mail to the last
address of record of the insured with return receipt requested as provided by the United
States Postal Service, or such other evidence of mailing as prescribed or accepted by the
United States Postal Service."
SECTION 6.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 156
- 4 -